Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6249.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding the Restrictions set forth and defined in MGL Chapter 184
Section 31, the Town of Chatham may expend funds for the purchase of, or otherwise acquire; or
may convey, Year-round Housing Occupancy Restrictions and Attainable Housing Restrictions,
as defined in 760 CMR 76.00: Seasonal Communities, which serve a critical and necessary
public purpose similar to Affordable Housing Restrictions, either in perpetuity or for a specified
number of years, whether stated in the form of a restriction, easement, covenant or condition in
any deed, mortgage, will, agreement, or other instrument executed by or on behalf of the owner
of the land appropriate to (a) limiting the use of all or part of the land to year-round occupancy or
occupancy by persons, or households of attainable income up to 250% AMI, in either rental
housing or other housing; (b) restricting the resale price of all or part of the property in order to
assure its affordability by future year-round occupant purchasers or attainable income
purchasers; (c) in any way limiting or restricting the use or enjoyment of all or any portion of the
of 2

land for the purpose of encouraging or assuring creation or retention of rental and other housing
for year-round occupancy or occupancy by attainable income persons and households.
Section 2. Any restriction contemplated and executed hereunder shall not require the
approval or execution of the Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities (as
successor to the Department of Housing and Community Development) as may otherwise be
required under Section 32 of Chapter 184 of the General Laws.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2